Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1114.
do enact as follows:AB1114,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1114,27Section 2. 20.255 (3) (fb) of the statutes is created to read:AB1114,2,9820.255 (3) (fb) Fine arts teacher mentorship program. Biennially, the amounts 9in the schedule for a fine arts teacher mentorship program under s. 115.412.AB1114,310Section 3. 115.412 of the statutes is created to read:AB1114,2,1511115.412 Fine arts teacher mentorship program. (1) Beginning in the 122026-27 school year, the department shall contract with a Wisconsin-based 13nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to 14section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code to establish a fine arts teacher 15mentorship program for beginning music, art, and performing arts teachers.AB1114,2,2116(2) The nonprofit organization that enters into a contract under sub. (1) shall 17match the amount provided by the department under this section. No moneys in 18the appropriation under s. 20.255 (3) (fb) may be disbursed until the nonprofit 19organization demonstrates to the department that the nonprofit organization meets 20or will meet the match requirement. The department may consider in-kind 21contributions received by the nonprofit organization for matching purposes.AB1114,2,2322(3) The fine arts teacher mentorship program under sub. (1) shall include all 23of the following:AB1114,3,31(a) Activities and consultation in support of beginning music, art, and 2performing arts teachers employed by school districts, including guidance in the 3classroom and at meetings.AB1114,3,64(b) Resources, including materials, time, and financial assistance for state 5conferences, that will support a beginning music, art, or performing arts teacher’s 6effectiveness in the classroom.AB1114,3,97(c) Connection of retired and currently employed, experienced music, art, and 8performing arts teacher mentors with beginning music, art, and performing arts 9teachers.AB1114,3,1310(d) Materials and advice specifically designed to prepare beginning music, 11art, and performing arts teachers for success in the music, art, or performing arts 12classroom and to prepare pupils in grades kindergarten to 12 for music, art, or 13performing arts performances and festivals.AB1114,3,1714(4) The nonprofit organization that enters into a contract under sub. (1) shall 15provide the department quarterly reports detailing the nonprofit organization’s 16compliance with the requirements under sub. (3) and any expenditures of moneys 17for the fine arts teacher mentorship program.AB1114,3,1918(5) The state superintendent may for good cause suspend, revoke, or refuse to 19renew a contract entered into in accordance with the provisions of this section.AB1114,4,220(6) The nonprofit organization that enters into a contract under sub. (1) may 21reimburse mentors in the fine arts teacher mentorship program for business travel 22expenses incurred in the performance of a mentor’s duties in the program at a rate 23not to exceed the current rate of reimbursement allowed under the standard 1method for computation of business travel expenses pursuant to the Internal 2Revenue Code.AB1114,4,33